Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0502

Patron and investor members' interests.

(1) Unless the organic rules establish investor members' interests, a member's interest is a patron member's interest.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, if a limited cooperative association has investor members, while a person is a member of the association, the person:

(a) If admitted as a patron member, remains a patron member;

(b) If admitted as an investor member, remains an investor member; and

(c) If admitted as a patron member and investor member remains a patron and investor member if not dissociated in one of the capacities.

[ 2019 c 37 s 502.]